North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 13. Highway Relocation Assistance Act. [Repealed]

§§ 136-156 through 136-174.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1107, s. 2.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to relocation assistance, see

G.S. 133-5

et seq.

As to authority of the Department of Administration to provide relocation assistance in the same manner as is prescribed for the Department of Transportation in this Article, see

G.S. 146-26.1

.